Indiana, session 2026, HB1232.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-30-5-6.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. (a) As used in this section, "public school" means
the following:
(1) A school maintained by a school corporation.
(2) A charter school.
(b) A public school must teach the Bible as literature in every
grade level, from kindergarten to grade 12. The public school must
provide age appropriate instruction on the history of Israel, the
moral and ethical teachings of the Old and New Testaments, the
life of Jesus, the history of the early Christian church, and the
Bible's influence on Western civilization.
(c) A public school may not:
(1) teach the Bible as religious dogma;
(2) coerce any student to believe or accept the Bible as
divinely inspired; or
(3) teach the Bible in any manner that violates the
2026 IN 1232—LS 6884/DI 106


establishment clause as interpreted by the Supreme Court of
the United States.
(d) A student shall be excused from Bible related instruction
upon the written request of the student's parent.
(e) The attorney general, upon request from a public school,
shall:
(1) provide advice on best methods for a public school to
comply with the requirements of this section; and
(2) defend any public school in a cause of action arising out of
the Bible instruction required by this section.
(f) This subsection applies if the attorney general represents a
public school as described in subsection (e)(2). If this subsection
applies, the state shall pay:
(1) the judgment or settlement amount; and
(2) all costs and litigation expenses;
arising from the action. The attorney general may settle or
compromise any claim in an action described in subsection (e)(2).
(g) This subsection applies if the attorney general does not
represent a public school as described in subsection (e)(2). If this
subsection applies, the state may not pay:
(1) the judgment or settlement amount; or
(2) any costs and litigation expenses;
arising from the action.
SECTION 2. IC 34-13-10 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 10. Church and State
Sec. 1. As used in this section, "governmental entity" means one
(1) or more of the following:
(1) The state.
(2) A state agency (as defined in IC 1-1-15-3).
(3) A political subdivision (as defined in IC 36-1-2-13) or an
instrumentality of a political subdivision (as defined in
IC 36-1-2-13).
(4) A public school, including a charter school.
(b) The term includes an:
(1) official;
(2) agent; or
(3) employee;
of an entity listed in subsection (a), including the governing body
of a public or charter school.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "separation doctrine" means a
2026 IN 1232—LS 6884/DI 106


doctrine holding that a governmental entity is prohibited from
providing a benefit, in whole or in part, to a person on the basis
that providing the benefit would violate one (1) or more of the
following:
(1) Separation of church and state.
(2) Article 1, Section 6 of the Constitution of the State of
Indiana.
(3) A provision of any of the following opinions from the
Supreme Court of the United States:
(A) Everson v. Board of Education, 330 U.S. 1 (1947).
(B) McCollum v. Board of Education, 333 U.S. 203 (1948).
(C) Engel v. Vitale, 370 U.S. 421 (1962).
(D) Abington School District v. Schempp, 374 U.S. 203
(1963).
(E) Epperson v. Arkansas, 393 U.S. 97 (1968).
(F) Lemon v. Kurtzman, 403 U.S. 602 (1971).
(G) Stone v. Graham, 449 U.S. 39 (1980).
(H) Wallace v. Jaffree, 472 U.S. 38 (1985).
(I) Edwards v. Aguillard, 482 U.S. 578 (1987).
(J) Lee v. Weisman, 505 U.S. 577 (1992).
(K) Santa Fe Independent School District v. Doe, 530 U.S.
290 (2000).
Sec. 3. Except as provided in section 6 of this chapter, a
governmental entity may not refuse to provide a benefit, in whole
or in part, to a person on the basis of Article 1, Section 6 of the
Constitution of the State of Indiana.
Sec. 4. Except as provided in section 7 of this chapter, a
governmental entity may not refuse to provide a benefit, in whole
or in part, to a person on the basis of the separation doctrine.
Sec. 5. Except as provided in section 7 of this chapter, a
governmental entity may not refuse to provide a benefit, in whole
or in part, to a person on the basis of the establishment clause. This
section does not apply if the person is the federal government, its
officers, or its instrumentalities.
Sec. 6. A governmental entity may refuse to provide a benefit,
in whole or in part, to a person on the basis of Article 1, Section 6
of the Constitution of the State of Indiana if the attorney general
determines that the Supreme Court of the United States has
overruled:
(1) Espinoza v. Montana Dept. Of Revenue, 140 S. Ct. 2246
(2020); and
(2) Carson v. Makin, 142 S. Ct. 1987 (2022).
2026 IN 1232—LS 6884/DI 106


Sec. 7. A governmental entity may refuse to provide a benefit,
in whole or in part, to a person on the basis of the separation
doctrine or the establishment clause if refusal to provide the
benefit is necessary to comply with:
(1) a judgment or decree entered by a court against that
specific governmental entity; or
(2) a ruling from the Supreme Court of the United States or
the United States Court of Appeals for the Seventh Circuit, if
there is no reasonable grounds to distinguish the ruling
factually or legally.
Sec. 8. (a) A person adversely affected by a violation of this
chapter may bring a civil action against the governmental entity
that violated the chapter.
(b) A prevailing plaintiff is entitled to:
(1) declaratory relief;
(2) injunctive relief;
(3) actual damages; and
(4) court costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
Sec. 9. (a) If a governmental entity brings a civil action that
relates to the denial of a benefit to a person on the basis of:
(1) Article 1, Section 6 of the Constitution of the State of
Indiana;
(2) the separation doctrine; or
(3) the establishment clause;
the governmental entity, and any attorney who represents the
governmental entity in the litigation, are jointly and severally
liable to the prevailing party for court costs and reasonable
attorney's fees.
(b) For purposes of this section, a party is a prevailing party if:
(1) a court dismisses a claim or cause of action brought
against the party by a governmental entity under subsection
(a), regardless of the reason for the dismissal;
(2) a court enters judgment in the party's favor on a claim or
cause of action; or
(3) a governmental entity seeking declaratory or injunctive
relief voluntarily dismisses its claim.
(c) A prevailing party may recover costs and reasonable
attorney's fees under this section only to the extent that those costs
and attorney's fees were incurred while defending claims or causes
of action on which the party prevailed.
(d) Regardless of whether a prevailing party sought to recover
costs or attorney's fees in the underlying action, a prevailing party
2026 IN 1232—LS 6884/DI 106


under this section may bring a civil action to recover costs and
attorney's fees against a governmental entity or attorney
representing a governmental entity, that sought declaratory or
injunctive relief described by subsection (a) not later than two (2)
years after the judgment becomes final.
(e) It is not a defense to an action brought under subsection (d)
that:
(1) a prevailing party failed to seek recovery of costs or
attorney's fees in the underlying action;
(2) the court in the underlying action declined to recognize or
enforce this section;
(3) the court in the underlying action held that any provisions
of this section are invalid, unconstitutional, or preempted by
federal law, notwithstanding the doctrine of issue or claim
preclusion; or
(4) the court is a federal court.
(f) Notwithstanding any other law, IC 34-7-7 and IC 34-13-9 do
not apply to an action brought under subsection (d).
2026 IN 1232—LS 6884/DI 106